North Carolina, session 2025, HB512.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 90-187.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-187.10. Necessity for license; certain practices exempted.
No individual shall engage in the practice of veterinary medicine without having a veterinary
license from the Board. No person, as defined in G.S. 90-181(5), may own a veterinary facility
without having a veterinary facility permit from the Board.
Nothing in this Article shall be construed to prohibit:
…
(13) Emergency medical services personnel, as defined in G.S. 131E-155, except
that individuals solely credentialed as emergency medical dispatchers shall
not be considered emergency medical services personnel for purposes of this
subdivision, who may provide emergency medical transport or emergency
medical services to an injured K-9 police unit animal or an injured certified
search and rescue dog deployed by or contracted to work with a federal, State,
or local agency or department at the scene of an emergency."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 7 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 131E-155.2. Emergency medical treatment for K-9 unit or search and rescue dog;
limited immunity.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, emergency medical services personnel shall not
be prosecuted for providing emergency medical transport or emergency medical services to an
injured K-9 police unit animal or an injured search and rescue dog if the emergency medical
services personnel acted in good faith when providing emergency medical transport or
emergency medical services to an injured K-9 police unit animal or an injured search and rescue
dog at the scene of an emergency. The immunity established by this section does not extend to
gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing that would otherwise be actionable.
For purposes of this section, a search and rescue dog is defined as a dog certified by any national
certification organization that is deployed by or contracted to work with a federal, State, or local
agency or department, and individuals solely credentialed as emergency medical dispatchers
shall not be considered emergency medical services personnel."
*H512-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. This act is effective 30 days after it becomes law and applies to acts
on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 512-Second Edition